Hawaii statutes.
§841-16 Disposal of decomposed remains.
The coroner's physician may order forthwith the cremation of the remains of any
person appearing to have come to death under any of the circumstances set forth
in section 841-3 if, in the coroner's physician's opinion, the remains
constitute an immediate menace to the public health. The cremation shall be
supervised by the coroner and shall take place only after a reasonable amount
of investigation has taken place in an effort to establish the identity of the
remains and the cause of death. Such cremation shall take place after a
burial-transit permit authorizing cremation has been secured from the local
agent of the department of health. [L 1949, c 355, pt of §5; RL 1955, §260-16;
HRS §715-16; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1973, c 17, §4; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next